Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3782.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 4, Chapter 368, O.S.L.
2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 1151.25a), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1151.25a. A. Except as otherwise provided in the
Roofing Contractor Registration Act, on and after the effective date
of this act November 1, 2026, every roofing contractor, except for
those defined in subsection G F of this section, offering to engage
in or engaging in performing residential roofing contractor work in
this state shall be required to receive a residential roofing
Req. No. 14363 Page 1

endo rsement. To receive a residential roofing endorsement, the
roofing contractor shall be required to take and successfully pass a
residential roofing examination approved under the provisions of
this act with a minimum score of seventy percent (70%), and be in
compliance with all other provisions of this act and rules before
acting or being endorsed as a residential roofing contractor. For
applicants who have been registered and in good standing with the
Construction Industries Board on the effective date of this act,
there shall be a twelve-month grandfathering-in period from the
effective date of this act to either pass the exam or complete an
additional ten (10) hours of continuing education credits approved
in advance by the Committee of Roofing Examiners to be granted a
residential roofer endorsement. Any applicant who has been
registered, is in good standing with the Board, and possesses a
current commercial roofer endorsement on the effective date of this
act shall be exempt from the residential roofing examination and
additional ten (10) hours of continuing education credits required
to receive a residential roofing endorsement The Construction
Industries Board shall set forth educational and training
requirements for residential roofers that are no less than required
education and training for commercial roofers.
B. Examinations for a residential roofer endorsement shall be
uniform and practical in nature and sufficiently strict to test the
qualifications and fitness of the applicants for endorsement.
Req. No. 14363 Page 2

Exam inations shall be in whole or in part in writing. Examinations
shall be offered at least monthly; dates, times, and locations shall
be determined by the registrar or third-party vendor with approval
of the registrar.
C. Any applicant initially failing to pass the examination
shall not be permitted to take another examination for a period of
thirty (30) days. Any applicant subsequently failing to pass the
examination shall not be permitted to take another examination for a
period of ninety (90) days. However, in a declared state of
emergency, the examination shall be available as often as possible
as determined by the registrar.
D. No residential roofer endorsement shall be renewed unless
the qualifying party has completed the required hours of continuing
education pursuant to subsection A of this section.
E. For all new applicants not registered and in good standing
with the Construction Industries Board prior to the effective date
of this act November 1, 2026, the Construction Industries Board
shall issue a residential roofer endorsement to qualifying
applicants no sooner than thirty (30) days from the date of
successful completion of the exam. New applicants shall not be
allowed to sell, offer, bid, inspect, or perform any residential
roofing contractor work in this state until a residential roofer
endorsement is issued.

Req. No. 14363 Page 3

F. E. For all applicants registered and in good standing with
the Construction Industries Board prior to the effective date of
this act November 1, 2026:
1. The residential roofer endorsement shall be issued
immediately upon compliance with the provisions of this section; and
2. Applicants shall be allowed to continue residential roofing
contractor work at all times during the residential roofer
endorsement application process.
G. F. The residential roofing endorsement shall not apply to
roofing labor contractors who:
1. Only provide roofing construction labor services;
2. Are working directly for a registered roofing contractor
that possesses a residential roofing endorsement; and
3. Are not providing any materials.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1115.25B of Title 59, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Roofers who are not licensed under the Oklahoma Insurance
Code may not represent, advise, or interpret insurance coverage or
shall be subject to penalties under this section, but may provide
construction-related information such as damage observations, repair
estimates, scope of work, and discussions with adjusters.
B. Violations of this section shall be submitted to the
Construction Industries Board with any determined violation to be
Req. No. 14363 Page 4

fine d up to One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per violation, to be
determined by the Board.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14363 TKR 01/13/26



















Req. No. 14363 Page 5